California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(6) Consolidate the collection and reporting of information for those programs that are closely related to child welfare services, including foster care and emergency assistance.

(7) Utilize the child welfare services functionality defined in
 current and planned automated systems as the foundation for the development of the technical requirements for the Child Welfare Services Case Management System.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Child Welfare Services Case Management System shall provide the required comprehensive and detailed individual county data needed by the department to implement and monitor the performance standards system.

(d) Counties shall fully utilize the functionality provided by the replacement statewide child welfare information system when it has been implemented statewide.

(e) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of
 Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions, which shall have the same force and effect as regulations, until final regulations are adopted.

(2) To ensure transparent and consistent communication, the department shall include an update on the development of regulations in the legislative updates associated with the quarterly forums convened pursuant to Section 16501.9. By October 1, 2024, the department shall provide a formal update on the status of the development of regulations to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(3) The department shall adopt final regulations no later than 24 months after the complete replacement for the statewide child welfare information system is implemented statewide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 573, Sec. 23.   (AB 207)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.6.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature for the State Department of Social Services to enhance the
 statewide child welfare information system to include information concerning the level of care required, educational accomplishments, and health history of children placed in foster care. If appropriate, this enhancement could be made after the system is operational statewide as required in Section 16501.5.

(b) The department shall conduct a study to examine the most efficient methods of collecting and maintaining all of the following data for each child in foster care:

(1) The names and addresses of the child’s health and educational providers.

(2) The child’s grade level performance.

(3) The child’s school record.

(4) Assurances that the child’s
 placement in foster care takes into account proximity to the school in which the child is enrolled at the time of placement.

(5) A record of the child’s immunizations.

(6) The child’s known medical problems.

(7) The child’s medications.

(8) Any other relevant level of care, health, and education information concerning the child as determined appropriate by the department.

(c) In conducting its study, the department shall, as required, examine county health passport systems for possible replication on a statewide basis and consult with other state departments, county associations, and provider groups.

(d) By February 15, 1992,
 the department shall submit a report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on the results of its study. The department shall include the following in its report:

(1) Recommendations for coordinating data collection among local child health and disability prevention programs, other health care providers, county welfare departments, schools, and other agencies providing services for foster children.

(2) Recommendations for the interfacing with any alternative system recommended pursuant to paragraph (1) with the mental health assessment required by Section 5407, and with other requirements of law.

(e) The report required by subdivision (d) shall address the feasibility, timeframe, and estimated costs of doing either of the following:

(1) Incorporating the data specified in subdivision (b) in the statewide child welfare information system.

(2) Implementing an alternative system that is more appropriate for the collection and maintenance of the data specified in subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 74.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.7.

(a) On or before December 1, 2005, the State Department of Social Services shall develop, and provide to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, a Child Welfare Services/Case Management System system performance commitments plan. The plan shall be developed in conjunction with the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration, the Office of Technology Services, and the County Welfare Directors Association.

(b) (1) The plan developed as required by subdivision (a) shall include, but not be limited to, performance standards for system availability, application transaction time, batch processing windows, data downloads, a process for the identification, tracking, and response of repair service requests, data backup and recovery, help desk responsiveness, and a process for security incidents.

(2) The plan may include print time.

(3) The plan shall describe all of the following:

(A) The mechanism for tracking system performance.

(B) Corrective action protocols.

(C) The steps that will be taken should performance fall below standards for a specified period of time.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the plan developed pursuant to this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Appropriately assign responsibility for ensuring service levels to the entity accountable.

(2) Prioritize implementation of components of the plan.

(3) Address implementation feasibility of the plan’s components, including any issues regarding plan
 implementation that need to be addressed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 72.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.8.

Social workers shall make reasonable efforts to collect and update necessary data regarding a child’s incarcerated parent or parents.

The Legislature encourages the Department of Justice, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, county welfare departments, and county sheriffs to develop protocols for facilitating the exchange of information regarding the location and
 sentencing of the incarcerated parent or parents of a minor child who is in dependency care.

Nothing in this section shall be interpreted to require the department to create a new field in the statewide database for incorporating the information specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 35, Sec. 129.   (SB 1013)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.9.

(a) (1) The Legislature hereby finds and declares the Child Welfare Services – California Automated Response and Engagement System (CWS-CARES), also known as the Child Welfare Services-New System (CWS-NS), is the most important system in the state for child welfare services staff to verify the safety and well-being of California’s children. It is the intent of the Legislature that the system shall meet the following objectives, which are intended to align with, and not materially differ from, the scope approved in the most recent Special Project Report:

(A) Replace the state’s Child Welfare Services/Case Management System (CWS/CMS) with a federally compliant Comprehensive Child Welfare Information System (CCWIS).

(B) Replace the counties’ external child welfare services systems with functionalities that are within the project’s approved scope, and streamline the design and configuration of county and state forms and reports during the development and implementation of each product milestone.

(C) Develop and implement application programming interfaces and other integrations within the approved project scope to exchange data critical for child welfare services between applicable federal, state, local, and other partners’ information technology (IT) systems.

(D) Improve the accuracy, availability, completeness, and timeliness of all data, documentation, and information needed by child welfare services staff, while reducing duplicative or manual data entry to the extent possible.

(E) Facilitate better communication and collaboration between child welfare services staff and other critical partners such as community organizations, multidisciplinary teams, and service providers.

(F) Incorporate relevant end-user feedback into product design, development, and implementation, to the extent possible, without significant increases in the total CWS-CARES IT project cost, schedule, and scope.

(G) Transition county and tribal users from CWS/CMS to CWS-CARES through effective engagement activities and stakeholder communications that drive user adoption.

(H) Maximize system availability and performance through service level agreements to avoid potential disruptions to child welfare services program operations.

(I) Minimize any
 potential risks to children and their families associated with CWS-CARES IT project development and implementation, and CWS-CARES maintenance and operations thereafter.

(J) Limit any additional delays to CWS-CARES IT project design, development, and implementation that could lead to federal noncompliance penalties, the potential loss of federal funding, or both.

(2) The Legislature further finds and declares that the successful completion of the CWS-CARES IT project shall be defined as the implementation of a federally compliant CCWIS that meets the Legislature’s objectives for the system, as established in paragraph (1). To the extent possible, project completion shall be accomplished within the baseline cost, schedule, and scope approved in the most recent Special Project Report. Any significant deviation from the project baseline in the most recent Special Project Report,
 excluding the refinement of product and project scope, may be considered as the basis for legislative action to achieve the objectives established in the most recent Special Project Report. Potential legislative action may include actions the Legislature may take to oversee or modify the project in order for it to be completed on time or within the existing budget without potential noncompliance with the CCWIS.

(b) (1) The Legislature further finds and declares that this project requires significant engagement with the end user throughout the life of the system, including the county human services agencies and child welfare services and probation staff.

(2) The State Department of Social Services and the Office of Technology and Solutions Integration (OTSI), in collaboration with the County Welfare Directors Association of California (CWDA), shall seek
 resources to enable the necessary level of engagement by the counties in the development and implementation of the CWS-CARES IT project and the maintenance and operations of CWS-CARES to prevent the disruption of services to at-risk families and children. This shall include, but not be limited to, timely and expeditious execution of contracts and contract amendments for participation in this effort, effective monitoring and evaluation of the CWS-CARES IT project, and implementation of any necessary mitigation strategies for risks and issues that arise in the development and implementation of the CWS-CARES IT project, or maintenance and operations of CWS-CARES thereafter.

(3) The department and OTSI shall provide a voting seat for a CWDA representative on all governance bodies of CWS-CARES, and shall support and provide necessary accommodation for the stationing of county representatives at the project site.

(c) (1) The Legislature further finds and declares that the CWS-CARES IT project requires ongoing oversight by the Legislature, the Department of Technology (CDT), and the Department of Finance (DOF). The Legislature intends that project oversight activities focus on the project making satisfactory progress towards its completion, including full achievement of the system objectives, as described in subdivision (a).

(2) The department and OTSI shall convene monthly meetings with the Legislative Analyst’s Office (LAO), legislative staff, CDT, DOF, CWDA, and other relevant parties to review project status reports. All reports shall be provided at least three business days before the monthly meeting. Monthly meetings shall continue until the CDT approves the postimplementation evaluation report for the CWS-CARES IT project.

(3) The department and OTSI shall submit monthly project status reports to the Legislature and other relevant stakeholders, including CWDA, regarding efforts to develop and implement CWS-CARES. The reports shall include, but not be limited to, the following information:

(A) An update on progress made towards successful completion of the project, as described in subdivision (a), including the status of product milestone development and implementation. Updates on the status of product milestones shall include the project’s progress on any data conversion, hardening, and testing that is associated with each milestone.

(B) The status of the project’s incorporation of end-user feedback, to the extent possible within the baseline cost, schedule, and scope approved in the most recent Special Project Report, during product
 discovery, milestone testing, scenario testing, and validation sprints. For major product and project decisions, reports shall include relevant documentation, showing consideration of end-user feedback, decisions made by the project about incorporation of the feedback, and the project’s justification for its decisions.

(C) An update on progress made towards user adoption of the system. Reports shall include relevant information about the status of current and upcoming end-user communications, stakeholder engagements, and training efforts.

(D) Any amendment to existing and any newly executed vendor contracts for the project, including the contract or amendment’s purpose, total cost, and term.

(E) A current list of project issues and risks. Reports shall highlight any high-level issues or risks that may do one or more
 of the following:

(i) Jeopardize the project’s successful completion.

(ii) Negatively impact county child welfare programs.

(iii) Result in a significant deviation from the baseline project cost, schedule, and scope in the most recent Special Project Report.

(F) Project performance related to scope, schedule, and budget, in accordance with the methodology developed with the independent advisor.

(4) (A) The department and OTSI, in coordination with the CDT and CWDA, shall schedule annual development progress demonstrations to provide an opportunity for the CWS-CARES IT project to demonstrate that they are making satisfactory progress towards project completion.
 Satisfactory progress shall include all of the following:

(i) The completion of planned product milestones, including all planned data conversion, hardening, and testing, without significant deviation from the baseline project cost, schedule, and scope in the most recent Special Project Report.

(ii) The incorporation of relevant end-user feedback into product design, development, and implementation, to the extent possible, without significant increases in the total CWS-CARES baseline project cost, schedule, and scope in the most recent Special Project Report.

(iii) Demonstrable progress made towards user adoption, consistent with the project’s strategic plan for user engagement, communication, and adoption, including clearly defined processes that measure and report on stakeholder engagements with the project,
 including, for example, stakeholder impact assessments.

(B) All parties responsible for oversight of the project, including the LAO, shall be permitted to attend the demonstration.

(d) The existing CWS/CMS operations and functionality shall be maintained at a level that is at least commensurate with its December 2015 status and shall not be decommissioned prior to the full statewide implementation of the CWS-CARES in all counties. For purposes of this subdivision, “full statewide implementation” means after all existing CWS/CMS core system functionality has been replaced in CWS-CARES and has been implemented in all 58 counties for a minimum of six months with no significant defects outstanding.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 74.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

16501.95.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall determine which entities meet the definition of a “child welfare contributing agency,” as defined in Section 1355.51 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) The department shall develop and issue written directives for child welfare contributing agencies to submit data to the applicable statewide child welfare information system. These directives shall address all of the following:

(1) Identification of which entities
 meet the definition of a child welfare contributing agency, as defined in federal regulations.

(2) The data that a child welfare contributing agency shall provide.

(3) The method in which a child welfare contributing agency shall provide data, which shall include either of the following:

(A) Direct data entry into the statewide child welfare information system.

(B) A bidirectional data exchange between the information systems maintained by the child welfare contributing agency and the
 statewide child welfare information system.

(4) A timeline for providing the specified data in the required manner.

(c) In accordance with the written directives of the department, a child welfare contributing agency shall provide child welfare services data that is collected as a result of fulfilling their contracts or agreements with the department or a county child welfare department, to the statewide child welfare information system.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, until regulations are adopted, the department may issue written directives by provider bulletins or
 all-county letters, as applicable. These written directives shall have the same force and effect as regulations. The written directives shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 50, Sec. 75.   (SB 187)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

16502.

The child welfare services authorized by this chapter shall be established in any county or combination of counties when a plan which includes financing of such services has been certified by the department. Such certified plan of child welfare services shall then be operated in accordance with standards and regulations established by the department, subject to all the provisions of this code relating to the supervision of public social services by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 978, Sec. 40.   Effective September 13, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

16502.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a county board of supervisors may receive and review any records in the custody of the juvenile court or any other involved county agencies relating to a child who has died and who had previously come to the attention of, or was under the supervision of, the county child welfare agency.

(b) The board may only receive and review the information in closed session. A board of supervisors in a county with a foster care population of
 more than 10,000 may take formal action to permit individual board members’ offices to receive and review the information for the purpose of determining which cases should be brought to the attention of the full board in closed session. The information or records obtained shall be maintained in a manner that ensures the maximum protection of privacy and confidentiality rights.

(c) The board or its members and staff may not disclose or release any information obtained pursuant to subdivision (a), unless otherwise permitted by state law, and shall be bound by all state and federal confidentiality laws.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 255, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

16503.

(a) Subsequent to completion of the hearing conducted pursuant to Section 366.26, the agency responsible for placement and care of a minor, or, on or after January 1, 2012, a nonminor dependent, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, shall ensure that a child in foster care shall receive administrative reviews periodically but no less frequently than once every six months. The administrative review
 shall determine the appropriateness of the placement, the continuing appropriateness and extent of compliance with the permanent plan for the child, the extent of compliance with the case plan, and adequacy of services provided to the child.

(b) The term “administrative review” means a review open to the participation of the parents of a child in foster care conducted by a panel of appropriate persons at least one of whom is not responsible for the case management of, or the delivery of services to, either the child or the parents who are the subject of the review. On and after January 1, 2012, administrative reviews held for nonminor dependents shall be conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 295 and subdivision (m) of Section 366.3.

(c) The department shall develop and implement regulations establishing processes, procedures, and standards for the conduct of
 administrative reviews that conform to Section 675.6 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(d) The requirements of this section shall not be interpreted as requiring duplicate concurrent court and administrative reviews.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 559, Sec. 64.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

16503.5.

(a) A placing agency shall provide a caregiver placement agreement to the child’s or nonminor dependent’s caregiver at the time of the child’s placement with that caregiver.

(b) (1) For purposes of this section, “caregiver placement agreement” means a written agreement between the placing agency and the child’s or
 nonminor dependent’s caregiver. The department shall approve the format and content of the placement agreement form to be used by a placing agency.

(2) For purposes of this section, “nonminor dependent” means an individual described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400.

(c) The agreement shall describe the terms and conditions of the placement and any agreements made by the placing agency and the child’s or nonminor’s caregiver.

(d) The agreement shall provide, at a minimum, the contact information for the placing agency’s social worker and the worker’s supervisor, including, but not limited to, telephone numbers, facsimile numbers, and identifying information about the child or nonminor, including, but not limited to, the child’s or nonminor’s social security number, if available, the child’s or nonminor’s Medi-Cal
 number or group health plan number and information, if available, and the child’s or nonminor’s State Department of Social Services identification number.

(e) A county placing agency may modify the forms to meet local needs by adding to the form requirements for information, but may not delete the form’s core elements as determined by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 846, Sec. 55.   (AB 1712)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

16504.

(a) Any child reported to the county child welfare services department to be endangered by abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall be eligible for initial intake and evaluation of risk services. Each county child welfare services department shall maintain and operate a 24-hour response system. An immediate in-person response shall be made by a county child welfare services department social worker in emergency situations in accordance with regulations of the department. The person making any initial response to a request for child welfare services shall consider providing appropriate social services to maintain the child safely in their
 own home. However, an in-person response is not required when the county child welfare services department, based upon an evaluation of risk, determines that an in-person response is not appropriate. An evaluation of risk includes collateral contacts, a review of previous referrals, and other relevant information.

(b) A county child welfare services department social worker shall make an in-person response whenever a referral is received pursuant to Section 11254. Whenever a referral is received pursuant to Section 11254, the county child welfare services department social worker, within 20 calendar days from the receipt of the referral, shall determine whether the physical or emotional health or safety of the individual or child would be jeopardized if the individual and child lived in the same residence with the individual’s own parent or legal guardian, or other adult relative.

(c) Notwithstanding Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11164) of Chapter 2 of Title 1 of Part 4 of the Penal Code, any nonminor dependent, as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11403, reported to the county welfare services department to be endangered by abuse, neglect, or exploitation by a licensed or approved caregiver while in a foster care placement shall be eligible for evaluation of risk services, to determine if the placement is safe and appropriate. The county child welfare services department shall cross-report the suspected abuse, neglect, or exploitation by the licensed or approved caregiver to the appropriate licensing or approval agency and, as appropriate, to law enforcement.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, county child welfare services departments do not need to substantiate or
 have allegations of abuse, neglect, or exploitation in order to provide voluntary services and stabilization support.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 79, Sec. 27.   (SB 119)   Effective July 29, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16504.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, a child welfare agency may secure from an appropriate governmental criminal justice agency the state summary criminal history information, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System for the following purposes:

(A) To conduct an investigation pursuant to Section 11166.3 of the Penal Code or an investigation involving a child in which the child is alleged to come within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300.

(B) (i) To assess the appropriateness and safety of placing, pursuant to Section 309 or 361.45, a child who has been detained or is a dependent of the court in the home of a relative, as defined in Section 319, or a nonrelative extended family member, as defined in Section 362.7.

(ii) When a relative or nonrelative extended family member who has been assessed pursuant to clause (i) and approved as a caregiver moves to a different county and continued placement of the child with that person is intended, the move shall be considered an emergency situation for purposes of this subparagraph.

(C) To attempt to locate a parent or guardian pursuant to Section 311 of a child who is the subject of dependency court proceedings.

(D) To obtain information about the background of a nonminor who has petitioned to reenter foster care under subdivision (e) of Section 388, in order to assess the appropriateness and safety of placing the nonminor in a foster care or other placement setting with minor dependent children.

(2) Any time that a child welfare agency initiates a criminal background check through the California Law Enforcement Telecommunications System for the purpose described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) and the child is placed with the relative or nonrelative extended family member, the agency shall ensure that a state-level fingerprint check is initiated pursuant to Section 16519.5 of this code and Section 8712 of the Family Code.

(b) Criminal
 justice personnel shall cooperate with requests for criminal history information authorized pursuant to this section and shall provide the information to the requesting entity in a timely manner.

(c) Any law enforcement officer or person authorized by this section to receive the information who obtains the information in the record and knowingly provides the information to a person not authorized by law to receive the information is guilty of a misdemeanor, as specified in Section 11142 of the Penal Code.

(d) Information obtained pursuant to this section shall not be used for any purposes other than those described in subdivision (a).

(e) This section shall not preclude a nonminor petitioning to reenter foster care or a
 relative or other person living in a relative’s home from refuting any of the information obtained by law enforcement if the individual believes the state- or federal-level criminal records check revealed erroneous information.

(f) (1) A state or county welfare agency may submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of parents or legal guardians when determining their suitability for reunification with a dependent child subject to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, for the purposes of obtaining information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal convictions and state or federal arrests, as well as information as to the existence and content of a record of state or federal arrests for which the Department of Justice
 establishes that the person is free on bail or on his or her own recognizance pending trial or appeal. Of the information received by the Department of Justice pursuant to this subdivision, only the parent’s or legal guardian’s criminal history for the time period following the removal of the child from the parent or legal guardian shall be considered.

(2) A county welfare agency or county probation office may submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice of nonminors petitioning to reenter foster care pursuant to Section 388, in order to assess the appropriateness and safety of placing the nonminor in a foster care or other placement setting with minor dependent children.

(3) When received, the
 Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this subdivision. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and respond to the state or county welfare agency.

(4) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the state or county welfare agency pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(5) The state or county welfare agency shall not request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code, for individuals described in this subdivision.

(6) The
 Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the costs of processing the request described in this subdivision.

(g) A fee, determined by the Federal Bureau of Investigation and collected by the Department of Justice, shall be charged for each federal-level criminal offender record information request submitted pursuant to this section and Section 361.4.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 910, Sec. 44.   (AB 1930)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

16504.6.

The State Department of Social Services shall evaluate a request from an Indian tribe to exempt a crime that is exemptible under Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code, if needed, to allow placement into an Indian home that the tribe has designated for placement under Section 361.31 and the federal Indian Child Welfare Act (25 U.S.C. Sec. 1901 et seq.). However, the tribe may request that the county with jurisdiction over the child evaluate the exemption request. Once a tribe has elected to have the exemption request reviewed by either the State Department of Social Services or the county, the exemption decision may only be made by that entity. Nothing in this section limits the duty of a county social worker to evaluate the home for placement or to gather
 information needed to evaluate an exemption request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 656, Sec. 33.   (AB 81)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

16504.7.

(a) Upon request by a county child welfare agency, the department shall provide a list identifying each person who has received a criminal records exemption pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 1522 of the Health and Safety Code related to a licensed or certified foster home so that the county may assess the appropriateness of placing a child who has been detained or is a dependent of the court in the licensed or certified foster home with which the individual is
 associated.

(b) Except as otherwise limited by state or federal law, the department shall make available to the county child welfare agency, summary information used in making the determination to grant the exemption. The department shall consult with the Department of Justice, counties, and other interested stakeholders to ensure that information is shared expeditiously and in accordance with state and federal law.

(c) For purposes of this section, “summary information” means information pertaining to the specific crimes for which the exemption was requested and a summary of the evidence the department used in making its determination to grant the exemption. The information shall be limited to one page for each crime exempted.

(d) In providing summary information pursuant to this section, the department shall not
 disclose the names of individuals who are not the subject of the exemption request. County child welfare agencies shall not disclose information related to the exemption beyond what is necessary, as determined by the department and in accordance with state and federal law, to assess the appropriateness of placing a child in a licensed or certified foster home.

(e) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall implement this section by means of an all-county letter issued on or before March 1, 2015. The all-county letter shall specify the process by which a county may request summary information, how the information will be issued by the department, and how the information may be used by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 222, Sec. 2.   (SB 1136)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

16506.

Family maintenance services shall be provided or arranged for by county welfare department staff in order to maintain the child in his or her own home. These services shall be limited to six months, and may be extended in periods of six-month increments if it can be shown that the objectives of the service plan can be achieved within the extended time periods, and provided within the county’s allocation. Family maintenance services shall be available without regard to income and shall only be provided to any of the following:

(a) Families whose child or children have been adjudicated a dependent of the court under Section 300, and where the court has ordered the county welfare department to supervise while the child remains in the child’s home.

(b) Families whose child is in potential danger of abuse, neglect, or exploitation, who are willing to accept services and participate in corrective efforts, and where it is safe for the child to remain in the child’s home only with the provision of services. 

(c) Families in which the child is in the care of a previously noncustodial parent, under the supervision of the juvenile court.

(d) Family maintenance services shall be provided to any individual and child who are referred pursuant to Section 11254 and who are not placed in foster
 care and who meet any of the criteria of subdivision (b) of Section 11254. The services shall be provided until the individual reaches 18 years of age.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 332, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

16506.5.

(a) Effective July 1, 2025, county child welfare agencies shall convene child and family team meetings, as defined in paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 16501, for children and youth receiving family maintenance services pursuant to Section 16506. Requirements for child and family teams, including, but not limited to, those described in Sections 832, 16501, and 16501.1, shall apply to child and family team meetings for children and youth receiving family maintenance services pursuant to Section 16506.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement, interpret, or
 make specific this section by means of all-county letters or similar instructions, which shall be exempt from submission to or review by the Office of Administrative Law and shall have the same force and effect of regulations, until regulations are adopted, not later than January 1, 2030.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 7, Sec. 9.   (AB 118)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

16507.

(a) Family reunification services shall be provided or arranged for by county welfare department staff in order to reunite the child separated from his or her parent because of abuse, neglect, or exploitation. These services shall not exceed 12 months except as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 361.5 and subdivision (c) of Section 366.3. Family reunification services pursuant to Section 361.6 may be
 provided to nonminor dependents as described in subdivision (v) of Section 11400. Family reunification services shall be available without regard to income to families whose child has been adjudicated or is in the process of being adjudicated a dependent child of the court under the provisions of Section 300. Family reunification services shall include a plan for visitation of the child by his or her grandparents, where the visitation is in the best interests of the child and will serve to maintain and strengthen the family relationships of the child.

(b) Family reunification services shall only be provided when a child has been placed in out-of-home care, or is in the care of a previously noncustodial parent under the supervision of the juvenile court.

(c) When a minor has been placed in foster care with a nonparent, family reunification services may be provided to one or both
 parents.
